Utah statutes.
63G-6-412 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Cancellation and rejection of bids.

An invitation for bids, a request for proposals, or other solicitation may be cancelled, or any or all bids or proposals may be rejected, in whole or in part, as may be specified in the solicitation, when it is in the best interests of the state in accordance with rules and regulations. The reasons shall be made part of the contract file.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

